Wyoming statutes. Title 22 Elections
Article 1. General Provisions

§ 22-22-101.
Cost of school or community college district elections.

The cost of a school or community college district election or equitably proportioned shares of a concurrent election as determined by the county clerk shall be paid by the appropriate board from the funds of the school district or community college district.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-297; Laws 1974, ch. 24, § 2.

§ 22-22-102.
Date of election of trustees; terms.

The election of members of the board of trustees of each school district and community college district shall be held at the regular polling places for each district on the Tuesday next following the first Monday in November in general election years, except as otherwise provided by law. Terms of office shall run for four (4) years beginning at 12:00 noon on the first day in December following the election, except as otherwise provided by law.

Repealed by Laws 1985, ch. 204, § 2.

Not more than a simple majority of members of the board of trustees of each school district and each community college district shall be elected at any election unless the election is to fill an unexpired term. This subsection shall not apply to the election of the initial board of a community college district or the first regular election of a community college district board.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-298; Laws 1974, ch. 24, § 2; 1975, ch. 185, §§ 2, 3; 1985, ch. 204, §§ 1, 2; 1987, ch. 222, § 1; 1988, ch. 24, § 1; 1998, ch. 100, § 2; 2015 ch. 138, § 1, effective March 4, 2015; 2022 ch. 58, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2015 amendment,

substituted “polling places for each district” for “polling places in each district”.

Laws 2015, ch. 138, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2015.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, added “, except as otherwise provided by law” at the end of the first and second sentences of (a); and added the second sentence in (c).

Cross references. —

As to filling vacancies in office generally, see §§

22-18-101

to

22-18-112

.

As to initial election of community college district board, see §

21-18-308

.

§ 22-22-103.
Establishment of election dates by boards of county commissioners.

For school or community college district elections set by boards of county commissioners, in determining the date of an election each county commissioner’s vote shall be weighted in proportion to the number of county commissioners and the population of electors of the district residing within that commissioner’s county. The population of electors shall be determined by the most recent voter registration lists.

History.

Laws 1996, ch. 97, § 1.